Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-2214.01
Real property, defined.

Real property means one or more defined interests, benefits, or rights inherent in the ownership of real estate.

Laws 1990, LB 1153, § 17;

Laws 2006, LB 778, § 35;

R.S.1943, (2009), § 76-2217;

Laws 2015, LB139, § 28.